Hawaii statutes.
§286-111 Application for license,
provisional license, or instruction permit; fees. [Section effective
until December 31, 2015. For section effective January 1, 2016, see below.] (a)
Every application for an instruction permit, provisional license, or driver's
license shall be made upon a form furnished by the examiner of drivers and
shall be verified by the applicant before a person authorized to administer
oaths. The examiner of drivers and officers serving under the examiner may
administer the oaths without charge. Each application for an instruction
permit for a category (1), (2), (3), or (4) license shall be accompanied by a
fee to be determined by the council of each county, and each application for a
provisional license or driver's license shall be accompanied by the fee, unless
the applicant has already paid the fee upon application for an instruction
permit in the same county, in which event no fee shall be charged. An
additional fee to be determined by the council of each county shall be charged
and collected upon the issuance of a provisional license or driver's license.
All of the foregoing fees shall become county realizations.

(b) The director shall establish by rule a
standard fee for all driver's license applicants who require verification
through the federal system that their presence in the United States is
authorized by federal law. The fees collected shall become state realizations
and be deposited into the state highway fund. The State shall reimburse the
counties all costs of verification through the federal system. The amount of
reimbursement shall be determined by the director of transportation.

(c) The director of transportation shall
establish a fee schedule for all commercial driver's licensing examinations.
The fees collected for a commercial driver's license shall become state
realizations and shall be deposited in the state highway fund. The State shall
reimburse the counties all costs for administering the commercial driver's
licensing program. The amount of reimbursement shall be determined by the
director of transportation.

(d) Every application shall state the full
name, date of birth, sex, occupation, veteran status if applicable and desired
by the applicant, social security number if the applicant is eligible for a
social security number, the residence address, and business address, if any, of
the applicant, shall briefly describe the applicant, and shall state whether
the applicant has theretofore been licensed as a driver, and, if so, when and
in what state or country, and whether any such license has ever been suspended
or revoked, or whether an application has ever been refused, and if so, the
date of and reason for the suspension, revocation, or refusal.

(e) If the applicant is not eligible to
receive a social security number, the applicant shall submit, in lieu of
providing proof of social security number pursuant to subsection (d):

(1) A United States Social Security Administration
letter stating that the applicant is ineligible to obtain a social security
number; and

(2) Either:

(A) A government-issued photo identification
document; or

(B) Other identification documents as deemed
acceptable by the director. [L 1937, c 234, §7; am L Sp 1941, c 6, §1; RL 1945,
§7308; RL 1955, §160-38; HRS §286-111; am L 1968, c 48, §5; am L 1970, c 164,
§3; gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 342, §20; am L 1999, c 269, §2; am L 2003, c 145,
§1; am L 2005, c 72, §§7, 15; am L 2010, c 38, §4 and c 85, §2; am L 2014, c 6,
§2]

§286-111 Application for license,
provisional license, instruction permit, limited purpose driver's license,
limited purpose provisional driver's license, or limited purpose instruction
permit; fees. [Section effective January 1, 2016. For section
effective until December 31, 2015, see above.] (a) Every application for
an instruction permit, provisional license, driver's license, limited purpose
driver's license, limited purpose
provisional driver's license, or limited purpose instruction permit
shall be made upon a form furnished by the examiner of drivers and shall be
verified by the applicant before a person authorized to administer oaths. The
examiner of drivers and officers serving under the examiner may administer the
oaths without charge. Each application for an instruction permit for a category
(1), (2), (3), or (4) license shall be accompanied by a fee to be determined by
the council of each county, and each application for a provisional license or
driver's license shall be accompanied by the fee, unless the applicant has
already paid the fee upon application for an instruction permit in the same
county, in which event no fee shall be charged. An additional fee to be
determined by the council of each county shall be charged and collected upon
the issuance of a provisional license or driver's license. All of the
foregoing fees shall become county realizations.

(b) The director shall establish by rule a
standard fee for all driver's license applicants who require verification
through the federal system that their presence in the United States is
authorized by federal law. The fees collected shall become state realizations
and be deposited into the state highway fund. The State shall reimburse the
counties all costs of verification through the federal system. The amount of
reimbursement shall be determined by the director of transportation.

(c) The director of transportation shall
establish a fee schedule for all commercial driver's licensing examinations.
The fees collected for a commercial driver's license shall become state
realizations and shall be deposited in the state highway fund. The State shall
reimburse the counties all costs for administering the commercial driver's
licensing program. The amount of reimbursement shall be determined by the
director of transportation.

(d) Every application shall state the full
name, date of birth, sex, occupation, veteran status if applicable and desired
by the applicant, social security number if the applicant is eligible for a
social security number, the residence address, and business address, if any, of
the applicant, shall briefly describe the applicant, and shall state whether
the applicant has theretofore been licensed as a driver, and, if so, when and
in what state or country, and whether any such license has ever been suspended
or revoked, or whether an application has ever been refused, and if so, the
date of and reason for the suspension, revocation, or refusal.

(e) Except as provided in section 286-104.5,
if the applicant is not eligible to receive a social security number, the applicant
shall submit, in lieu of providing proof of social security number pursuant to
subsection (d):

(1) A United States Social Security Administration
letter stating that the applicant is ineligible to obtain a social security
number; and

(2) Either:

(A) A government-issued photo identification
document; or

(B) Other identification documents as deemed
acceptable by the director. [L 1937, c 234, §7; am L Sp 1941, c 6, §1; RL 1945,
§7308; RL 1955, §160-38; HRS §286-111; am L 1968, c 48, §5; am L 1970, c 164,
§3; gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 342, §20; am L 1999, c 269, §2; am L 2003, c 145,
§1; am L 2005, c 72, §§7, 15; am L 2010, c 38, §4 and c 85, §2; am L 2014, c 6,
§2; am L 2015, c 172, §3]

Attorney General Opinions

The fee applies to nonresident servicemen and is not a tax
nor a license fee imposed in respect to motor vehicles or the use thereof.
Att. Gen. Op. 66-29.

Nonresident serviceman with home-state license must comply
with section and is not exempted therefrom by the Soldier's and Sailor's Civil
Relief Act. Att. Gen. Op. 68-24.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next